Wyoming, session 2025, HB0031.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 21-3-137 is created to read:

21-3-137. School safety and security policies.

(a) Each school district board of trustees shall
adopt safety and security policies, including threat
assessment procedures.

HB0031

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0147
(b) The superintendent of each school district shall
implement the safety and security policies adopted under
subsection (a) of this section.

(c) A school district's safety and security policies
and drafts of the policies shall be confidential and shall
not be deemed a public record available for public
inspection under the Public Records Act. Each school
district board of trustees may develop, discuss and review
safety and security policies under this section in
executive session not open to the public under W.S.
16-4-405(a)(ix) and (xii).

Section 2. W.S. 21-3-110(a) by creating a new
paragraph (xliv) and 35-9-107 by creating a new subsection
(d) are amended to read:

21-3-110. Duties of boards of trustees.

(a) The board of trustees in each school district
shall:

HB0031

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0147
(xliv) Adopt school safety and security policies
in accordance with W.S. 21-3-137.

35-9-107. Duties and powers of state fire marshal.

(d) The state fire marshal shall not prohibit the use
of a door securement device used under a school safety and
security policy adopted under W.S. 21-3-137. The state fire
marshal may adopt rules regulating the use of door
securement devices, including requiring that door
securement devices only be deployed to address active
threats or during safety drills under W.S. 35-9-505.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0031